Idaho, session 2026, H0731.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-144, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-144. PARTICIPATION IN FEDERAL TAX CREDIT SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM. (1)
The state of Idaho hereby elects to participate in the federal tax credit
scholarship program established under section 70411, P.L. 119-21.
(2) The state department of education shall:
(a) No later than the first day of January of each year, submit to the
United States secretary of the treasury and publish on the department's
website a list of qualified scholarship granting organizations that
meet the requirements under section 70411, P.L. 119-21, and are located
in this state;
(b) Certify to the United States secretary of the treasury the state de-
partment of education's authority to submit the list on behalf of the
state;
(c) Accept submissions from scholarship granting organizations
throughout the year for inclusion on the list submitted pursuant to
paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(d) Comply with any other requirement under section 70411, P.L. 119-
21, including any applicable federal regulations or guidance, to ensure
that the state is eligible to participate in taxable years beginning in
tax year 2027.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.